en: steamed
de: Gedämpfter
it: al vapore
pl: parowany, parowana, parowane
sv: ångpreparerad, ångpreparerat, ångpreparerade
zh: 蒸制

de: gegart, gegarte, gegarter, gegartes, vorgegarte
nl: gegaard, gegaarde

en: uncooked
de: ungekocht, ungekochte, ungekochter, ungekochtes
es: sin cocer
it: non cotto
nl: ongekookt, ongekookte
zh: 未煮

en: unblanched
es: sin blanquear
fr: non-blanchie
zh: 未焯水

en: caramelized, caramelised
bg: карамелизиран, карамелизирана, карамелизирано, карамелизирани
bs: karamelizovani
ca: caramel-litzat
de: Karamellisiertes
fi: karamellisoitu
fr: caramélisé
hr: karamelizirani, karameliziranih, karamelizirano
hu: karamellizált
it: caramellato, caramellata, caramellati, caramellate
nl: gekarameliseerde, gekaramelliseerde
pl: karmelizowany, karmelizowana, karmelizowane, karmelizowanego, karmelizowanej, karmelizowanych
pt: caramelizado, caramelizada, caramelizados, caramelizadas
sv: karamelliserad, karamelliserat, karamelliserade
uk: карамелізований, карамелізована, карамелізоване, карамелізовані
zh: 焦糖化

en: puffed, inflated
da: puffede, poppede
de: gepufft, gepuffte, gepuffter, gepufftes, gepoppt, gepoppte, gepoppter
es: hinchado, hinchada, hinchados, hinchadas, inflado, inflada, inflados, infladas
fr: soufflé, soufflée, soufflés, soufflées
hr: ekspandirana, ekspandirani, ekspandiranih
hu: puffasztott, felfújt
it: soffiato, soffiati, soffiata, soffiate
nl: gepoft, gepofte
pl: dmuchany, dmuchane, dmuchana, preparowany, preparowana, preparowane, ekspandowany, ekspandowane, ekspandowana
se: puffat
sv: puffat, puffad, puffade, krisp
zh: 膨化

en: pre-fried, prefried
bg: предварително пържени, предварително пържено, предварително пържена, предварително пържени
ca: pre-fregit, pre-fregides
da: forstegt
de: vorgebraten, vorgebratene, vorgebratener, vorgebratenes
es: prefrito, prefrita, prefritos, prefritas
fr: pré-frit, pré-frite, pré-frits, pré-frites, préfrit, préfrite, préfrits, préfrites
hr: prepržene, prepržena, preprženi, preprženo, preprženog
hu: elősütött
it: pre-fritto, pre-fritta, pre-fritti, pre-fritte
ja: 事前に揚げた, 事前に炒めた
nl: vooraf gefrituurd, vooraf gefrituurde
pl: podsmażone, podsmażane, podsmażona, podsmażana, podsmażony, podsmażany
pt: pré-frito, pré-frita, pré-fritos, pré-fritas
ro: pre-prăjit, pre-prăjită, pre-prăjiți, pre-prăjite
sv: förfriterad, förfriterat, förfriterade
zh: 预炸

en: fried
bg: пържено, пържен, пържена, пържени
ca: fregida, fregides
cs: smažený, smažená, smažené
da: stegte
de: frittiert, frittierte, frittierter
es: frito, fritos, frita, fritas
fr: frit, frite, frits, frites
hr: pržene, pržena, prženi, prženo, prženog
hu: sült
it: fritto, fritta, fritti, fritte
ja: フライド, 炒め
nb: stekt
nl: gefrituurd, gefrituurde
pl: smażony, smażona, smażone
pt: frito, frita, fritos, fritas
ro: prăjit, prăjită, prăjiți, prăjite
sv: friterad, friterat, friterade, stekt
uk: смажений, смажена, смажене, смажені, обсмажений, обсмажена, обсмажене, обсмажені, засмажений, засмажена, засмажене, засмажені
zh: 油炸

en: roasted, baked
bg: печено, печен, печена, печени
ca: rostit, rostits, rostida, rostides
cs: pražené
da: ristet, ristede, bagt, bagte
de: gebraten, gebratene, gebratener, gebratenes
el: ψημένο, στο φούρνο
es: asado, asada, asados, asadas
et: röstitud
fr: rôti, rôtie, rôtis, rôties, torréfié, torréfiée, torréfiés, torréfiées
hu: pörkölt
it: arrostito, arrostita, arrostiti, arrostite
ja: ロースト
nl: gebraden
pt: assado, assada, assados, assadas
ro: copt, coaptă, copți, coapte
sk: pražené
sv: rostad, rostat, rostade, bakad
uk: печений, печена, печене, печені, запечений, запечена, запечене, запечені
zh: 烘烤

en: dry roasted
ca: torrat a l'aire, torrats a l'aire, torrada a l'aire, torrades a l'aire
de: trocken geröstet, trocken geröstete, trocken geröstetes, trocken gerösteter
es: asado al seco, asada al seco, asados al seco, asadas al seco
fr: grillé à sec, grillée à sec, grillés à sec, grillées à sec
hu: szárazon pirított, szárazon pirítottak, szárazon pirított, szárazon pirítottak
it: arrostito a secco, arrostita a secco, arrostiti a secco, arrostite a secco
ja: 焙煎
nl: droog geroosterd, droog geroosterde, droog geroosterde, droog geroosterde
pl: prażony na sucho, prażone na sucho, prażona na sucho, prażone na sucho
pt: torrado a seco, torrada a seco, torrados a seco, torradas a seco
sv: torrostad, torrostat, torrostade

en: chargrilled, char grilled
zh: 炭烤

en: toasted
ca: torrat, torrats, torrada, torrades
de: geröstet, geröstete, geröstetes, gerösteter, getoastet, getoastete, getoasteter, getoastetes
es: tostado, tostada, tostados, tostadas
fi: paahdettu, paahdetut
fr: toasté, toastée, toastés, toastées
hu: pirított
it: tostato, tostata, tostati, tostate
nb: ristet, ristede
nl: geroosterd, geroosterde, getoaste, gebrand
pl: prażony, prażone, prażona, prażonego, prażonej, prażonych
pt: tostado, tostada, tostados, tostadas, torrado, torrada, torrados, torradas
sl: praženi
zh: 焙烤

en: untoasted, unroasted
de: ungeröstet, ungeröstete, ungerösteter, ungeröstetes
es: sin tostar
fr: non grillé, non grillée, non grillés, non grillées
it: non tostato, non tostata, non tostati, non tostate
nl: ongeroosterd, ongebrand, ongebrande
pt: não torrado, não torrada, não torrados, não torradas
zh: 未焙烤

en: dark toasted
zh: 深度焙烤

en: grilled
de: gegrillt, gegrillte, gegrillter, gegrilltes
es: a la parrila, a la brasa
fi: grillattu
fr: grillé, grillée, grillés, grillées
hr: pečena, pečeni
hu: grillezett
it: grigliato, grigliata, grigliati, grigliate
nl: gegrild, gegrilde
pl: grillowany. grillowana
pt: grelhado, grelhada, grelhados, grelhadas
sv: grillad, grillat, grillade

es: barbeque, barbequed
pt: churrasco

en: sauteed
fr: sauté, sautée, sautés, sautées, rissolé, rissolée, rissolés, rissolées

en: melted
ca: fos
de: geschmolzen, geschmolzene, geschmolzenes
es: fundido, fundida, fundidos, fundidas
fr: fondu, fondue, fondus, fondues
hr: topljenih, topljeni
it: fuso, fusa, fusi, fuse
ja: 溶けた
nl: gesmolten
pl: topiony, topiona, topione
pt: fundido, fundida, fundidos, fundidas
sv: smält, smälta, smälta

en: enriched
de: angereichert, angereicherte, angereichertes, angereicherten
es: enriquecida
fr: enrichi, enrichie, enrichis, enrichies
hr: obogačena
nl: verrijkt, verrijkte, verrijkt, verrijkte
pl: wzbogacany, wzbogacana, wzbogacane, wzbogacanej, wzbogacanego, wzbogacanych, fortyfikowany, fortyfikowana, fortyfikowane
pt: enriquecido, enriquecida, enriquecidos, enriquecidas, enriquecido com, enriquecida com, enriquecidos com, enriquecidas com, enriquecido em, enriquecida em, enriquecidos em, enriquecidas em
sv: berikad, berikat, berikade

en: enriched with fat
ca: enriquida en matèria grassa
es: enriquecida en materia grasa
fr: enrichi en matière grasse